Wisconsin, session 2025, AB584.
do enact as follows:AB584,11Section 1. 66.0435 (3) (c) 1. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB584,2,9266.0435 (3) (c) 1. (intro.) In addition to the license fee provided in pars. (a) and 3(b), each licensing authority shall collect from each unit occupying space or lots in a 4community in the licensing authority, except from recreational mobile homes as 5provided under par. (cm), from prefabricated structures described under s. 70.11 6(49), from manufactured and mobile homes that constitute improvements to real 7property, from recreational vehicles as defined in s. 340.01 (48r), and from camping 8trailers as defined in s. 340.01 (6m), a monthly municipal permit fee computed as 9follows:AB584,210Section 2. 70.11 (49) of the statutes is created to read:AB584,2,161170.11 (49) Recreational prefabricated structures. Any prefabricated 12structure originally designed to be towed upon a highway by a motor vehicle and 13used primarily as temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, travel, or 14seasonal purposes, including accessory decks, sheds, and porches, if such 15prefabricated structures are located in a licensed campground under s. 97.67 upon 16land that is not owned by the owner of such prefabricated structures.AB584,317Section 3. 70.17 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB584,3,151870.17 (3) Beginning with the property tax assessments as of January 1, 2024, 19manufactured and mobile homes, not otherwise exempt from taxation under s. 2066.0435 (3) or 70.11 (49), buildings, improvements, and fixtures on leased lands, 1buildings, improvements, and fixtures on exempt lands, buildings, improvements, 2and fixtures on forest croplands, and buildings, improvements, and fixtures on 3managed forest lands shall be assessed as real property. If buildings, 4improvements, and fixtures, but not the underlying land, are leased to a person 5other than the landowner or if the buildings, improvements, and fixtures are owned 6by a person other than the landowner, the assessor may create a separate tax parcel 7for the buildings, improvements, and fixtures and assess the buildings, 8improvements, and fixtures as real property to the owner of the buildings, 9improvements, and fixtures. The assessor may also create a tax parcel, as provided 10under s. 70.27, for buildings, improvements, and fixtures on exempt lands, 11buildings, improvements, and fixtures on forest croplands, and buildings, 12improvements, and fixtures on managed forest lands and assess the buildings, 13improvements, and fixtures as real property to the owner of the buildings, 14improvements, and fixtures. For purposes of this subsection, “buildings, 15improvements, and fixtures” does not include any property defined in s. 70.04.AB584,416Section 4. 79.0965 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB584,3,171779.0965 (title) State aid; repeal of personal property tax; exemptions.AB584,518Section 5. 79.0965 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:AB584,3,221979.0965 (1m) Beginning in 2027, the department of administration shall pay 20to each taxing jurisdiction, as defined in s. 79.095 (1) (c), an amount equal to the 21property taxes levied on property described under s. 70.11 (49) for the property tax 22assessments as of January 1, 2025.AB584,623Section 6. 79.0965 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:AB584,4,42479.0965 (2m) Each municipality shall report to the department of revenue, in 1the time and manner determined by the department, the amount of the property 2taxes levied on property described under s. 70.11 (49) for the property tax 3assessments as of January 1, 2025, on behalf of the municipality and on behalf of 4other taxing jurisdictions.AB584,75Section 7. 79.0965 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB584,4,12679.0965 (3) Each taxing jurisdiction shall attribute to each tax incremental 7district within the taxing jurisdiction the district’s proportionate share of the 8amount the taxing jurisdiction receives under sub. subs. (1) and (1m). The amount 9that would have been paid to a tax incremental district under this subsection shall 10be distributed to the municipality and applicable taxing jurisdictions in the year 11following the termination of the tax incremental district and in each year 12thereafter.AB584,813Section 8. 79.0965 (5) of the statutes is created to read:AB584,4,171479.0965 (5) The department of revenue shall certify the amount of the 15payment due each taxing jurisdiction under sub. (1m) to the department of 16administration, and the department of administration shall make the payment on 17or before the first Monday in July.AB584,933718Section 9337. Initial applicability; Revenue.AB584,4,2019(1) Recreational prefabricated structures. The treatment of s. 70.11 20(49) first applies to the property tax assessments as of January 1, 2026.AB584,4,2121